Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-8,129.01
State Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund; created; receipts; disbursements.

There is hereby created a fund, to be known as the State Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund, from which shall be appropriated such amounts as are available and as shall be considered incident to the administration of the State Athletic Commissioner's office. Money in the State Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund may be transferred to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The fund shall contain all license fees and gross receipts taxes collected by the commissioner as provided under sections 81-8,128 to 81-8,142.01, which shall be paid into the state treasury and the State Treasurer shall credit the money to the State Athletic Commissioner's Cash Fund.

Laws 1973, LB 118, § 1;

Laws 1980, LB 849, § 3;

Laws 1983, LB 469, § 6.